Washington statutes.
RCW 36.92.030

County central services department—Created—Supervisor.

By resolution, the board of county commissioners may create a county central services department which shall be organized and function as any other department of the county. When a board creates a central services department, it shall also provide for the appointment of a supervisor to be the administrative head of such department, subject to the supervision and control of the board, and to serve at the pleasure of the board. The supervisor shall receive such salary as may be prescribed by the board. In addition, the supervisor shall be reimbursed for traveling and other actual and necessary expenses incurred by him or her in the performance of his or her official duties.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4150; 1967 ex.s. c 103 s 4.]